Hawaii statutes.
§660-15 Costs. If the party is
confined in any prison or is in the custody of any civil officer, the court or
judge granting the writ shall certify thereon the sum to be paid for the
expense of bringing the party from the place where the party is imprisoned or
restrained. The officer to whom the same is directed shall not be bound to
obey it, unless that sum is paid or tendered to the officer. This section is
subject to section 607-3, pursuant to which prepayment of the expense may be
waived, or the sum required may be reduced or remitted. [L 1870, c 32, §11; RL
1925, §2738; RL 1935, §4323; RL 1945, §10364; RL 1955, §239-15; HRS §660-15; am
L 1972, c 90, §5(h), (i); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next